Louisiana, session 2026, HB509.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:1105(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1105. Hearings; notice; public records
* * *
E. In every parish in which an application for a Class VI permit has been
filed, a public hearing to receive comments from the public shall be required prior
to the issuance of a permit. The department shall provide public notice of any draft
permit and of the hearing to be held pursuant to this Subsection. The department
shall also provide a public comment period of at least thirty days following such
notice.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-427 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 509